Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.240

Agency shop fees as contributions. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) A labor organization may not use agency shop fees paid by an individual who is not a member of the organization to make contributions or expenditures to influence an election or to operate a political committee, unless affirmatively authorized by the individual.

(2) A labor organization does not use agency shop fees when it uses its general treasury funds to make such contributions or expenditures if it has sufficient revenues from sources other than agency shop fees in its general treasury to fund such contributions or expenditures.

[ 2024 c 164 s 466; 2007 c 438 s 1; 1993 c 2 s 16 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992). Formerly RCW 42.17A.500, 42.17.760.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2007 c 438: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 11, 2007]." [ 2007 c 438 s 2.]

Short title—1993 c 2: See note following RCW 29B.40.010.